Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,101
Hospital authority; trustees; bonds; exempt from liability.

Neither the trustees of the authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.101.